California statutes. Business and Professions Code
A rectifier who also performs the functions of a distilled spirits wholesaler shall comply with all the provisions of this division applicable to a holder of a distilled spirits wholesaler’s license.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

23372.

A wine rectifier’s license authorizes the person to whom issued to cut, blend, rectify, mix, flavor, or color wine upon which the excise tax imposed by Part 14 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code has been paid, and whether so cut, blended, rectified, mixed, flavored, or colored by him, or any other person, to package, label, export, and sell the products to persons holding licenses issued by the department authorizing the sale of wine. The holder of a wine rectifier’s license may apply for and hold a wine importer’s license, a distilled spirits manufacturer’s license, or a distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent’s license. A wine rectifier’s license shall not be
 issued to or held by the holder of a retail off-sale or retail on-sale license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1842.)
-------------------------------------------

23373.

A California winegrower’s agent’s license authorizes any of the following:

(a) The possession of wine produced in California and brandy distilled in California in public or private warehouses.

(b) The sale to wholesalers for his or her own account or the solicitation of and sale to wholesalers for the account of a licensed winegrower of wine that was produced in this state and brandy that was distilled in this state.

(c) The invoicing and collection on behalf of a winegrower of payments for orders solicited by the agent.

(d) Performance or furnishing on behalf of the winegrower for which he or she is an agent, of the services which the winegrower is authorized to perform or furnish under the provisions of Sections 23356.1, 25503.1, 25503.2, 25503.3, 25503.5, 25503.8, 25503.9, 25503.26, and 25503.85.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 567, Sec. 1.   Effective October 7, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

23373.1.

Neither the holder of any wholesaler’s license nor the holder of any retail license may hold a California winegrower’s agent’s license, except that the holder of a wholesaler’s license who has been a primary distributor for a winegrower for more than 20 years immediately prior to the effective date of this section may continue to be issued and to hold a beer and wine wholesaler’s license and a distilled spirits wholesaler’s license as well as a California winegrower’s agent’s license.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 783.)
-------------------------------------------

23373.2.

A winegrower or brandy manufacturer may be represented by only one California winegrower’s agent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 783.)
-------------------------------------------

23373.4.

A California winegrower’s agent’s license authorizes the holder to furnish samples, to produce and distribute wine lists, to produce and furnish advertising material, retailers’ advertising specialties and consumer advertising specialties, with respect to the wine or brandy he distributes as an agent for a winegrower or brandy manufacturer so authorized.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 783.)
-------------------------------------------

23373.5.

Nothing in this division shall preclude the department from taking disciplinary action against a winegrower or brandy manufacturer for any violation of this division when such violation was committed by the holder of a California winegrower’s agent’s license while acting on behalf of the winegrower or brandy manufacturer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 783.)
-------------------------------------------

23374.

Any importer’s license authorizes the person to whom issued to become an importer of alcoholic beverages specified in the license, to export the alcoholic beverages, and to transfer the beverages to himself under another license.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

23374.5.

A distilled spirits importer’s general license authorizes the person to whom issued to become an importer of distilled spirits and to sell distilled spirits to distilled spirits manufacturers, distilled spirits manufacturer’s agents, distilled spirits wholesalers, rectifiers and distilled spirits general importers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2192.)
-------------------------------------------

23374.6.

A beer and wine importer’s general license authorizes the person to whom issued to become an importer of beer or wine and to sell state tax paid beer or wine to beer manufacturer's, wine grower's, beer and wine wholesaler's, wine rectifier’s and beer and wine importer’s general licensees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1687.)
-------------------------------------------

23375.

(a) A public warehouse license authorizes the storage of alcoholic beverages for the account of another licensee, including storage in a United States customs bonded warehouse, a United States internal revenue bonded warehouse, and a United States bonded wine cellar.

(b) The department may issue to the holder of a public warehouse license a duplicate of the original public warehouse license for each additional warehouse operated by the licensee, which authorizes the exercise of all privileges of the original public warehouse license at the additional warehouse or warehouses.

(c) The term “duplicate public warehouse license,” as used in this section, only applies
 herein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 29, Sec. 19.   (SB 82)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

23375.5.

No distilled spirits importer’s general license shall be issued to any person who holds an interest, directly or indirectly, in an on-sale or off-sale general license.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2192.)
-------------------------------------------

23375.6.

No beer and wine importer’s general license shall be issued to any person who holds an interest, directly or indirectly, in any retail license. No retail license shall be issued to any beer and wine importer’s general licensee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1687.)
-------------------------------------------

23376.

A customs broker’s license authorizes the transfer to licensed importers of alcoholic beverages brought into the State in United States internal revenue bond or in United States customs bond and the exportation of the alcoholic beverages. The holder of a customs broker’s license may receive delivery of, possess, export, and transfer to licensed importers such alcoholic beverages as are brought into this State in United States internal revenue bond or customs bond. Such a license also authorizes the possession and exportation of alcoholic beverages acquired from licensed manufacturers or wine growers for export.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

23377.

A wine broker’s license authorizes the person to whom issued to act as a wine broker, for a fee or commission, in the purchase of wine for or on behalf of a person within or without this State authorized to buy wine for purposes of resale and in the sale of wine for or on behalf of a person, other than a retail licensee, licensed to sell wine within the State. A wine broker shall not buy or sell any wine for his own account, take or deliver title to wine, or receive or store any wine in his own name in this State. A wine broker shall not offer to sell, agree to offer to sell, or sell any wine unless he first has a bona fide authorization to do so from a person, other than a
 retail licensee, licensed to sell wine in this State. A wine broker shall not offer to buy, agree to buy, agree to offer to buy, or buy any wine unless he first has a bona fide authorization to do so from a person within or without this State authorized to buy wine for purposes of resale. The exercise of the privileges granted by the wine broker’s license are subject to such rules and conditions as the department deems necessary and proper.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 447.)
-------------------------------------------

23378.

Any wholesaler’s license authorizes the sale of the alcoholic beverage specified in the license only to persons holding licenses issued by the department authorizing the sale of the alcoholic beverage, and authorizes the exportation of the alcoholic beverage.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 447.)
-------------------------------------------

23378.05.

(a) For any sale or offer of sale of beer by a beer wholesaler within the state, the beer wholesaler shall comply with all of the following:

(1) Pursuant to Section 25000.5, the beer wholesaler shall file and maintain with the department a written territorial agreement with each beer manufacturer prior to the wholesaler’s sale or offer of sale of each beer manufacturer’s beer.

(2) Pursuant to Section 25000, the beer wholesaler shall file prices with the department for each beer manufacturer’s beer prior to the wholesaler’s sale or offer of sale of each manufacturer’s beer.

(3) (A) The beer wholesaler shall own or lease a warehouse sufficient to store at one time a stock of beer equal to 10 percent or more of the wholesaler’s annual volume of beer case and keg sales to retailers within this state.

(B) The beer wholesaler shall maintain at all times in a warehouse either owned or leased by the wholesaler a stock of beer equal to not less than 5 percent of the wholesaler’s annual volume of beer case and keg sales to retailers within this state.

(C) If a beer wholesaler has more than one leased or owned
 licensed warehouse premises, the wholesaler shall be required to comply with the conditions of subparagraphs (A) and (B) only in connection with one licensed warehouse premises.

(4) The beer wholesaler shall receive all beer for sale at the wholesaler’s licensed warehouse premises, unload and maintain the beer on the premises, and record the beer into the wholesaler’s inventory and for the California Beverage Container Recycling and Litter Reduction Act, prior to any sale or reloading for delivery.

(5) The beer wholesaler shall sell only beer that the wholesaler owns and has in physical possession and that is not acquired, held, or offered for sale under consignment.

(6) The beer wholesaler shall sell beer only from the wholesaler’s licensed warehouse premises or pursuant to Section 23388.

(7) The beer wholesaler shall deliver all beer sold to retailers for delivery from the wholesaler’s licensed warehouse premises only with equipment owned, leased, or rented by the wholesaler.

(8) The beer wholesaler shall sell beer for resale generally and not to a single retailer or retailers that have a direct or indirect interest in the wholesaler or in each other and that are owned in whole or in part or managed or controlled directly or indirectly by the retailer or retailers.

(b) For purposes of this section, “beer manufacturer” means any holder of a beer manufacturer’s license, any holder of an out-of-state beer manufacturer’s certificate, or any holder of a beer and wine importer’s general license.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 492, Sec. 1.   (AB 2469)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

23378.1.

(a) A California brandy wholesaler’s license may be issued only to the holder of a beer and wine wholesaler’s license, and authorizes the person to whom it is issued (hereafter in this section called “licensee”) to sell only brandy produced in California to persons holding licenses authorizing the sale of brandy, and to export that brandy, subject to all of the following conditions:

(1) The licensee shall:

(A) Maintain warehouse space either owned or leased by him or her or dedicated to his or her use in a public warehouse which space is sufficient to store at one time a stock of California brandy whose cost of acquisition is one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or more.

(B) Maintain at all times in his or her warehouse either owned or leased by him or her or in space dedicated to his or her use in a public warehouse a stock of California brandy whose cost of acquisition is one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or more. If a licensee has more than one licensed premise, he or she shall be required to maintain warehouse space for and a stock of California brandy whose cost of acquisition is one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or more only in connection with one licensed premise. For each of
 the remaining licensed premises, the licensee shall be required to maintain warehouse space for and a stock of California brandy whose cost of acquisition is thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) or more. The stock of California brandy required by this paragraph shall be owned by the licensee, not held on consignment, and not acquired pursuant to a prior agreement to sell it to a specific licensee or licensees.

(2) The licensee shall sell California brandy to retailers generally, rather than a few selected retailers. A licensee who sells to 25 percent of the retailers in the county where his or her California brandy wholesale licensed premises are located, or a licensee whose total volume of sales of California brandy to retailers during any 12-month period consists of 50 percent or more of individual sales in quantities of 10 cases or less, shall be conclusively presumed to be selling to retailers generally.

(3) The licensee may sell only one California brandy of one winegrower, which brandy is produced or bottled by the winegrower, or which is produced for, or is produced and packaged for, the winegrower, and is sold under a brand name owned or controlled by the winegrower.

(4) The licensee, under the authority of his or her beer and wine wholesaler’s license, shall stock and offer to sell to retailers a complete product line of California wines of the winegrower whose brandy the licensee handles. A “complete product line” for the purposes of this paragraph means all of the types of wines sold under a particular label.

(b) The number of California brandy wholesaler’s licenses which may be issued shall not be limited by any rule of the department relating to the number which may be issued in any county, nor shall those
 licenses be included in any formula used by the department in determining the number of distilled spirits wholesaler’s licenses which may be issued in a county.

(c) The fee for a California brandy wholesaler’s license shall be two hundred seventy-six dollars ($276) per year, which shall be deposited in the Alcohol Beverage Control Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 29.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

23378.2.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, a licensed wholesaler or importer may be issued and may hold retail package off-sale beer and wine licenses if the wholesaler or importer sells wine and no other alcoholic beverages at or from the retail premises.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 284, Sec. 1.   Effective July 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

23379.

A beer and wine wholesaler’s license also authorizes the labeling, bottling, or packaging of wine in accordance with and subject to the rules of the State Department of Public Health. A beer and wine wholesaler’s license shall not permit the sale or delivery of wine to consumers in containers supplied, furnished, or sold by the consumer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

23380.

An industrial alcohol dealer’s license authorizes the sale of undenatured ethyl alcohol in packages of more than one gallon for use in the trades, professions, or industries and not for beverage consumption and also authorizes the importation and exportation of undenatured ethyl alcohol.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 554.)
-------------------------------------------

23381.

Any manufacturer's, wine grower's, manufacturer’s agent's, rectifier’s or wholesaler’s license authorizes the licensee to:

(a) Deal in warehouse receipts, for the kind of alcoholic beverages which the licensee is authorized to sell, with other licensed manufacturers, wine growers, distilled spirits manufacturer’s agents, rectifiers, or wholesalers who are authorized to sell the kind of alcoholic beverages covered by the warehouse receipt.

(b) Sell warehouse receipts for brandy produced in this State to licensees of other states who are authorized
 to deal in brandy, for the purpose of storage of the brandy covered by the warehouse receipts in internal revenue bonded warehouses in this State for subsequent export to another state.

Nothing in this division prohibits the sale of a warehouse receipt for alcoholic beverages by any other person, in accordance with rules adopted by the department, to manufacturers, wine growers, manufacturer’s agents, rectifiers, and wholesalers licensed to sell the kind of alcoholic beverages covered by the warehouse receipt when the warehouse receipt was acquired by the person prior to May 1, 1941.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 447.)
-------------------------------------------

23382.

An offer or agreement to sell distilled spirits, which at the time of the offer or agreement are stored in containers larger than one gallon capacity and the ownership of which is represented by a warehouse receipt, shall be deemed a sale of a warehouse receipt.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

23383.

Any manufacturer's, wine grower's, manufacturer’s agent's, importer's, rectifier's, or wholesaler’s license also authorizes the transfer of title to the alcoholic beverages specified in the license to other licensed manufacturers, wine growers, manufacturer’s agents, importers, rectifiers, and wholesalers when the alcoholic beverages are in storage in a licensed public warehouse, United States customs bonded warehouse, United States internal revenue bonded warehouse, or United States bonded wine cellars located at any place within the state without any additional or other license therefor. Such licenses also authorize the sale of alcoholic beverages specified in the license
 to persons who, under such procedure as shall be established by the department, take delivery of the alcoholic beverages in this State for delivery or use without the State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1600.)
-------------------------------------------

23384.

Any licensed beer manufacturer, wine grower, brandy manufacturer, rectifier, or wholesaler may, in addition to the other privileges exercised under his or her license and in accordance with rules prescribed by the department sell tax-paid alcoholic beverages mentioned in the license of the licensee to nonlicensees having a fixed place of business or residence upon territory within this State which is maintained by the United States Government as a military or naval reservation or national park or veterans homes, and veterans homes maintained by the State of California, and Indian country or land dedicated for use by the Indians.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 906, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

23385.

Any distilled spirits manufacturer’s or brandy manufacturer’s license and any rectifier’s license authorizes the sale, in conformity with United States internal revenue laws and regulations, of the distilled spirits authorized to be sold by the license in packages larger than one gallon for use in the trades, professions, or industries and not for beverage use.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

23386.

(a) Any manufacturer’s, wine grower’s, manufacturer’s agent’s, rectifier’s, importer’s, or wholesaler’s license also authorizes the giving away of samples of the alcoholic beverages that are authorized to be sold by the license under the rules that may be prescribed by the department. A retail license does not authorize the furnishing or giving away of any free samples of alcoholic beverages.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), an on-sale retail licensee authorized to sell wine
 may instruct consumers at the on-sale retail licensed premises regarding wines sold by the retail licensee. Notwithstanding subdivision (a), an on-sale retail licensee authorized to sell distilled spirits may instruct consumers at the on-sale retail licensed premises regarding distilled spirits. The instruction may include, without limitation, the history, nature, values, and characteristics of the product, and the methods of presenting and serving the product. The instruction of consumers may include the furnishing of not more than three tastings to any individual in one day. A single tasting of distilled spirits may not exceed one-fourth of one ounce and a single tasting of wine may not exceed one ounce. Nothing in this subdivision shall limit the giving away of samples pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 248, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

23387.

In addition to the other privileges exercised under a wholesaler’s or rectifier’s license, a wholesaler or rectifier may sell the alcoholic beverages mentioned in his or her license to persons who take delivery of the alcoholic beverages within this state for delivery or use outside of the state within 90 days from the date of the sale in accordance with rules and regulations prescribed by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 910, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

23388.

A licensed beer manufacturer or a licensed beer wholesaler, in addition to selling beer at their licensed premises, may sell beer from wagons, trailers, or trucks operated by them to licensees authorized to sell beer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 30, Sec. 1.   (AB 233)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

23389.

(a) The department may issue to a beer manufacturer a duplicate of its original license for a location or locations other than its licensed premises of production or manufacture. A duplicate license issued by the department authorizes the maintenance and operation of each branch office by the beer manufacturer and shall only have the license privileges set forth in this section. The fee for each duplicate license, regardless of type, shall be as specified in Section 23320.

(b) Subject to the limitations set forth in this section, a licensed beer manufacturer may exercise all of the privileges under its manufacturer’s license at branch offices licensed by the department, except for
 production or manufacture; sales to consumers for consumption on or off the branch office premises, except as provided for in subdivision (c); and the sale of beer and wine to consumers for consumption on the branch office premises where a bona fide public eating place is owned and operated by and for the beer manufacturer, except as provided for in subdivision (c).

(c) (1) A beer manufacturer shall not sell any alcoholic beverages to consumers for consumption on or off the licensed premises, or provide authorized tastings to consumers, at more than eight branch office locations, regardless of how many beer manufacturer licenses are held by the beer manufacturer either alone or under common ownership with any other licensed beer manufacturer, and no more than four of the eight branch locations may be bona fide public
 eating places owned and operated by and for the beer manufacturer. A branch office location authorized to sell an alcoholic beverage or provide a tasting to consumers for consumption on or off the licensed premises or that is a bona fide public eating place owned and operated by and for the beer manufacturer before the effective date of the act adding this section, shall be counted against the limit imposed by this subdivision. A beer manufacturer licensee shall not be eligible to receive a seventh or an eighth duplicate license authorized under this paragraph until it has held a sixth duplicate license for a minimum of one year.

(2) A branch office location where consumer tastings or sales for on- or off-premises consumption are authorized shall not sell or serve any alcoholic beverages other than beer that is produced and bottled by, or
 produced and packaged for, the beer manufacturer.

(3) A branch office location where the sale of beer and wine to consumers for consumption on the premises of a bona fide public eating place is authorized shall not sell or serve alcoholic beverages other than the following:

(A) Beer and wine that is produced and bottled by, or produced and packaged for, the beer manufacturer.

(B) Beer and wine that is purchased by the beer manufacturer from a licensed wholesaler.

(d) In order to obtain a duplicate license for a branch location or locations with the privileges described in subdivision (c), a beer manufacturer shall submit any application forms as the department may
 require. Upon request, and upon payment by the beer manufacturer of a fee of one hundred dollars ($100), the department shall issue to a beer manufacturer a beer manufacturer temporary permit for use at a branch office location during the period the application for a duplicate license with privileges pursuant to subdivision (c) is pending. The beer manufacturer temporary permit shall authorize the beer manufacturer to exercise all of the privileges under the duplicate license except for those privileges described in subdivision (c).

(e) A beer manufacturer temporary permit shall be effective for a period of 120 days and may be extended at the discretion of the department for additional 120-day periods as necessary and upon payment of an additional fee of one hundred dollars ($100).

(f) In order to obtain a duplicate license for a branch office location or locations without the privileges described in subdivision (c), a beer manufacturer shall submit all application forms as the department may require, and the department shall issue that duplicate license forthwith; provided, however, that any duplicate license issued forthwith by the department shall be contingent on the beer manufacturer consenting to the imposition of a condition that the beer manufacturer shall make no changes in the character or mode of operation of the branch office premises that would directly or indirectly expand the privileges under the duplicate license, such as to include those privileges described in subdivision (c), without notice to and approval by the department. If the department receives any protest concerning the issuance of the duplicate license forthwith under this subdivision, the
 protest shall be considered as an accusation against the licensee and a hearing had thereon as if an accusation had been filed. Any proposed changes in the character or mode of operation of the branch office premises that would directly or indirectly expand the privileges under the duplicate license, such as to include those privileges
 described in subdivision (c), shall require reapplication and reissuance of the duplicate license pursuant to subdivision (d).

(g) Notwithstanding the provisions of any other section of this division, a beer manufacturer may continue to exercise privileges at all of its licensed branch offices that were in existence and authorized by the department prior to the effective date of the act adding this section, including any privileges resulting from any renewal or transfer of the duplicate licenses for the branch locations, that it was authorized to exercise prior to that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 962, Sec. 1.   (AB 2307)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

23390.

(a) A licensed winegrower or brandy manufacturer, in addition to exercising all the privileges of their license at their licensed premises, may exercise all the license privileges at or from branch offices or warehouses, or United States bonded wine cellars located away from the place of production or manufacture, other than the following privileges:

(1) Production or manufacture. For purposes of this paragraph, “production or manufacture” does not include mere storage of wine or topping of wine barrels, provided that the licensee
 complies with all federal and state laws regarding those activities, including, but not limited to, recordkeeping requirements.

(2) The sale of wine or brandy to consumers for consumption on the premises in a bona fide eating place.

(b) The department may issue to a winegrower or brandy manufacturer a duplicate of the original license for a location or locations other than the wine production or brandy manufacture premises. The duplicate license authorizes the maintenance and operation of each branch or warehouse or United States bonded wine cellar declared and designated by the winegrower or brandy manufacturer at the location for which the duplicate license is issued.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, the department may allow any person that held more than one original winegrower’s license, on or before January 1, 1981, to transfer any duplicate license which has been issued, on or before January 1, 1981, on any of the original winegrower’s licenses to any other original winegrower’s license held by that person, on or before January 1, 1981, provided that the licensee cancels the original winegrower’s license from which any duplicate license is transferred. This subdivision shall not authorize any person to acquire any additional duplicate licenses other than those held by that licensee on or before January 1, 1981.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 25607, if a winegrower’s license
 and a brandy manufacturer’s license are held under identical ownership at the same premises, where one of the licenses is a master license and the other license is a branch license, the licensee may store, age, conduct tastings pursuant to Section 23363.3, and engage in sales to consumers for consumption off the premises.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 562, Sec. 2.   (AB 720)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

23390.5.

(a) For purposes of this section, “licensed branch office” means a branch office or warehouse, or United States bonded wine cellar, located away from the licensed winegrower’s or brandy manufacturer’s place of production or manufacture, for which a duplicate license has been issued.

(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 23358, 23360, and 23390, a licensed winegrower or brandy manufacturer shall not sell wine or brandy to consumers or engage in winetasting activities at more than two licensed branch premises. This section is not and shall not be construed to be retroactive and notwithstanding any other provisions of this division shall not prohibit such sales or limit the quantity thereof or prohibit winetasting activities at a licensed branch office or
 branch offices under the existing duplicate license or licenses therefor in existence on January 1, 1966, or any renewal or transfer thereof or at any licensed branch office opened by the licensee in place of such licensed branch office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 274, Sec. 2.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

23391.

If a violation of any provision of this division or of any rule of the department is committed in the exercise of the license privileges authorized to be exercised at any branch office, and the violation becomes a matter of investigation, hearing, or decision by the department with relation to the license of the licensee, the department in making its ruling or decision, if the violation is found to be one committed in connection with the operation of the branch office and not a violation in connection with manufacturing or production or the manufacturing or production premises, shall not suspend, revoke, or interfere with the manufacturer’s or wine grower’s license privileges
 or license at his place of manufacture or production but shall limit the application of its decision, permissible under this division, to and in connection with the particular duplicate license and the premises in the operation of which the violation occurred.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 447.)
-------------------------------------------

23392.

If a violation of any provision of this division or of any rule of the department is committed in connection with the premises where the act of manufacturing beer or producing wine is performed, the department in making its ruling or decision in connection with the violation shall limit its decision, permissible under this division, to and in connection with the license upon the premises of manufacture or production and to the particular function exercised by the licensee wherein a violation occurred, such as manufacturing, production, importing, exporting, packaging, labeling, selling to wholesalers, or selling to retailers, and any existing duplicate license for any branch
 office, unless the branch office actually participated in the commission of the violation, shall not be affected or interfered with by the decision or by reason of the violation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 447.)
-------------------------------------------

23393.

A retail package off-sale beer and wine license authorizes the sale, to consumers only and not for resale, of beer in containers, and wine in packages and in quantities of 52 gallons or less per sale, for consumption off the premises where sold.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 721.)
-------------------------------------------

23393.5.

(a) The department may issue a limited off-sale retail wine license which authorizes the sale of wine by the licensee if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) Sales are restricted to those solicited and accepted via direct mail, telephone, or the internet.

(2) Sales are not conducted from a retail premises open to the public.

(3) The licensee takes possession of and title to all wine sold by the licensee.

(4) All wine sold by the licensee is delivered to the purchaser from the licensee’s licensed premises or from a licensed public warehouse.

(b) The sale of wine shall only be to consumers and not for resale, in packages or quantities of 52 gallons or less per sale, for consumption off the premises where sold.

(c) The licensee shall comply with Section 23985, but is exempted from Sections 23985.5 and 23986.

(d) The department may impose reasonable conditions upon the licensee as may be needed in the interest of public health, safety, and welfare.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 29, Sec. 21.   (SB 82)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

23394.

An off-sale general license includes the privileges specified in Section 23393 and authorizes the sale, to consumers only and not for resale, except to holders of daily on-sale general licenses issued pursuant to Section 24045.1, of distilled spirits for consumption off the premises where sold. Standards of fill for distilled spirits authorized for sale pursuant to this section shall conform in all respects to the standards established pursuant to regulations issued under the Federal Alcohol Administration Act (27 U.S.C. Secs. 201 et seq.) and any amendments thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 24, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

23394.5.

No privileges under an off-sale general license, except as provided in Section 23106, shall be exercised by the licensee in more than one room or building unless the rooms or buildings are contiguous and the access between such rooms or buildings is adequate and available for general public use without the necessity of using any public or private street, alley or sidewalk.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 198.)
-------------------------------------------

23394.7.

No privileges under an off-sale license shall be exercised by the licensee at any customer-operated checkout stand located on the licensee’s physical premises.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 726, Sec. 2.   (AB 183)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

23395.

Nothing in this division prevents the sale, in packages of less than one-half pint, of bitters or other aromatic or flavoring or medicinal preparations, which are classed for taxing purposes as distilled spirits, by off-sale general licensees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

23396.

(a) Any on-sale license authorizes the sale of the alcoholic beverage specified in the license for consumption on the premises where sold. No alcoholic beverages, other than beers, may be sold or served in any bona fide public eating place for which an on-sale license has been issued unless the premises comply with the requirements prescribed in Section 23038, 23038.1, 23038.2, or 23038.3.

(b) (1) In addition to the privilege in subdivision (a), any on-sale license for a premises located in an entertainment zone authorizes the licensee to permit consumers to leave the licensed premises with open containers of alcoholic beverages for consumption off the
 premises within the entertainment zone if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(A) The alcoholic beverage is specified in both the license and the ordinance creating the entertainment zone.

(B) Open alcohol containers only leave the premises during the hours allowed by the ordinance establishing the entertainment zone.

(C) Patrons with open containers exit the licensed premises directly into an entertainment zone.

(D) All alcoholic beverages in the entertainment zone are purchased only at a licensed premises located within the entertainment zone.

(E) The premises expressly prohibits
 open containers or closed containers of alcoholic beverages acquired outside their premises.

(F) Delivery of alcoholic beverages to consumers within the entertainment zone by the licensee or by any third-party delivery service is expressly prohibited unless the delivery is to a residential building or private business that is not a licensee.

(G) No alcoholic beverages purchased at the licensed premises may leave the premises in an open glass or metal container for consumption in an entertainment zone.

(H) The licensee annually submits their notice of intent to participate in an open container entertainment zone to the department.

(2) This subdivision does not
 require a licensee to sell any alcoholic beverage for consumption off the premises within an entertainment zone.

(3) Licensees whose privileges are restricted due to operating conditions or other statutory restrictions may be prohibited from exercising entertainment zone privileges that are contrary to their operating conditions. For purposes of this paragraph, any restrictions on the exercise of off-sale privileges shall not apply to the removal of open alcoholic beverages from the licensed premises for consumption in the entertainment zone.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 869, Sec. 4.   (SB 969)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

23396.1.

(a) An on-sale general license for restricted service lodging establishments authorizes those hotels and motels described in subdivision (b) to sell alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises only as follows:

(1) By means of controlled access alcoholic beverage cabinets located in guestrooms, subject to the conditions specified in Section 23355.2.
